Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.610

Area which may be included—Inclusion of area within city or town—Procedure.

A park and recreation service area may include any unincorporated area in the state, and when any part of the proposed district lies within the corporate limits of any city or town said resolution or petition shall be accompanied by a certified copy of a resolution of the governing body of said city or town, approving inclusion of the area within the corporate limits of the city or town.

[ 1973 c 65 s 1.]